Hawaii statutes.
§281-13 Meetings. Meetings of the
liquor commission or the liquor control adjudication board may be held at any
time and as often from time to time as the commission or board deems necessary
for the proper transaction of its business, upon call of the chairperson or by
any other two members of the commission or board. The administrator shall give
notice of the meetings as the commission or board may prescribe to the several
members, and give any other notice thereof directed by the commission or board.

A majority of all the members of the commission
or board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, but the
affirmative vote of a majority of all of the members shall be necessary to
determine any matter before it. [L Sp 1933, c 40, §5; RL 1935, §2574; RL 1945,
§7225; am L 1951, c 223, §1(3); RL 1955, §159-12; HRS §281-13; am L 1990, c
171, §4; gen ch 1992; am L 1998, c 249, §5]

Cross References

Meetings and records of public agencies, requirements
concerning, see chapter 92.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next